California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) For children removed after October 1, 1983, document that it provided preplacement preventive services to the child prior to the child’s placement in foster care, and document why provisions of these services were not successful in maintaining the child in his or her home, unless it is documented that these services were not provided due to either of the following:

(A) The voluntary relinquishment of the child by one or both parents or court action declaring a child free from the custody and control of one or both parents.

(B) The child’s residence with a nonrelated legal guardian.

(2) Develop a
 written assessment of the reasons necessitating the child’s placement in foster care and the treatment needs of the child while in foster care to be updated by the agency no less frequently than once every six months. Where the child is a parent who has a child living with him or her in the same eligible facility, the assessment shall also address the needs of his or her child.

(3) Develop a case plan for the child within a maximum of 60 days of placement.

(4) Ensure that services are provided to return the child to his or her own home or establish an alternative permanent placement for the child if returning home is not possible or is inappropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 222.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.1.

In order to be eligible for AFDC-FC, the child shall receive a periodic review no less frequently than once every six months and a permanency hearing within 12 months after the date the child entered foster care, pursuant to Section 361.49. The child shall also receive permanency planning hearings periodically, but no less frequently than once each 12 months thereafter, as required by subdivision (d) of Section 366.3 throughout the period of foster care placement. Periodic reviews and permanency planning hearings shall not be required for a child who is residing
 with a nonrelated legal guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 120, Sec. 5.   Effective August 6, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.2.

When a child qualified for federal financial participation under the AFDC-FC program is residing with a relative caretaker and the relative caretaker makes application to adopt the child, the relative caretaker shall, notwithstanding state law or regulations, continue to be eligible for foster care payments for the period after the child’s parents’ rights have been terminated, either by relinquishment or by an action of the juvenile court, and until the adoption of the child is finalized. This payment shall be terminated upon either finalization of the adoption or
 denial of the adoption application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 418, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11405.

(a) Except for nonminors described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), AFDC-FC benefits shall be paid to an otherwise eligible child living with a nonrelated legal guardian, provided that the legal guardian cooperates with the county welfare department in all of the following:

(1) Developing a written assessment of the child’s needs.

(2) Updating the assessment no less frequently than once every six months.

(3) Carrying out the case plan developed by the county.

(b) Except for nonminors described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), when AFDC-FC is applied for on behalf
 of a child living with a nonrelated legal guardian the county welfare department shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop a written assessment of the child’s needs.

(2) Update those assessments no less frequently than once every six months.

(3) Develop a case plan that specifies how the problems identified in the assessment are to be addressed.

(4) Make visits to the child as often as appropriate, but in no event less often than once every six months.

(c) Where the child is a parent and has a child living with them in the same eligible facility, the assessment required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall include the needs of their child.

(d) Nonrelated legal guardians of eligible children who are in receipt of AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall be exempt from the requirement to register with the Statewide Registry of Private Professional Guardians pursuant to former Sections 2850 and 2851 of the Probate Code.

(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor youth whose nonrelated guardianship was ordered in juvenile court pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26, and whose dependency was dismissed, shall remain eligible for AFDC-FC benefits until the youth attains 19 years of age, effective January 1, 2013, until the youth attains 20 years of age, and effective January 1, 2014, until the youth attains 21 years of age, provided that the youth enters into a mutual agreement with the agency responsible for their guardianship, and the youth is meeting the conditions of eligibility, as described
 in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.

(2) A nonminor former dependent or ward, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, shall be eligible for benefits under this section until the youth attains 21 years of age if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The nonminor former dependent or ward attained 18 years of age while in receipt of Kin-GAP benefits pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385).

(B) The nonminor’s relationship to the kinship guardian is defined in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 11391.

(C) The nonminor was under 16 years of age at the time the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced.

(D) The guardian continues to be responsible for the support of the nonminor.

(E) The nonminor otherwise is meeting the conditions of eligibility, as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.

(f) On or after January 1, 2012, a child whose nonrelated guardianship was ordered in probate court pursuant Article 2 (commencing with Section 1510) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Probate Code, who is attending high school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training on a full-time basis, or who is in the process of pursuing a high school equivalency certificate before their 18th birthday may continue to receive aid following their 18th birthday as long as the child continues to reside in the guardian’s home, remains otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC benefits and
 continues to attend high school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training on a full-time basis, or continues to pursue a high school equivalency certificate, and the child may reasonably be expected to complete the educational or training program or to receive a high school equivalency certificate, before their 19th birthday. Aid shall be provided to an individual pursuant to this section provided that both the individual and the agency responsible for the foster care placement have signed a mutual agreement, if the individual is capable of making an informed agreement, documenting the continued need for out-of-home placement.

(g) (1) For cases in which a guardianship was established on or before June 30, 2011, or the date specified in a final order, for which the time for appeal has passed, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association, et al. v. William
 Lightbourne, et al. (U.S. Dist. Ct. No. C 07-05086 WHA), whichever is earlier, the AFDC-FC payment described in this section shall be the foster family home rate structure in effect before the effective date specified in the order described in this paragraph.

(2) For cases in which guardianship has been established on or after July 1, 2011, or the date specified in the order described in paragraph (1), whichever is earlier, and through December 31, 2016, the AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall be the basic foster family home rate structure effective and available as of December 31, 2016.

(3) For cases in which guardianship has been established by the juvenile court on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1, 2027, or the
 effective date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall not exceed the home-based family care rate structure developed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and Section 11463.

(4) (A) For cases in which guardianship has been established by the juvenile court on and after the date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate paid shall not exceed Tier 1 of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, unless the conditions of subparagraph (B) apply.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the rate paid may exceed Tier 1, but shall not exceed Tier 2, of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, under specific conditions established by the department and based on the assessed needs of the child.

(5) For cases in which guardianship has been established in the probate court on or after January 1, 2017, the AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall not exceed the basic level rate of the home-based family care rate structure in effect on June 30, 2027.

(6) Beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, the AFDC-FC payments identified in this subdivision shall be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the California Necessities Index rate as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461.

(h) In addition to the AFDC-FC rate paid, all of the following also shall be paid:

(1) A specialized care increment, if applicable, as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 11461.

(2) A clothing allowance, as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461.

(3) For a child eligible for an AFDC-FC payment who is a teen parent, the rate shall include the two-hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment made to the relative caregiver in a whole family foster home pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 19.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.5.

A refugee who is eligible for, and is required to participate in, an alternative project implemented pursuant to Section 412(e)(7) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (Section 1522(e)(7) of Title 8 of the United States Code), shall not be eligible for benefits under this chapter. This section shall apply only when an alternative project uses payment levels for project participants that are substantially equal to payment levels in effect for persons receiving aid under this chapter, with respect to both cash and in-kind payments, and if the assistance
 provided to the alternative project participant is considered a grant rather than a loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1311, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.

If, when and during such times as the federal statutes provide federal funds for any child who is granted aid pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11450, the department shall establish such regulations as are necessary for this state to qualify for any federal funds available.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11400 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1166, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

11408.

County claims for aid to needy children placed in foster care, as defined by the rules and regulations of the department, shall be filed separately and distinct from other claims and shall be filed for aid furnished by the county at times and in the manner prescribed by the department. Payments for such children may be made subsequent to the furnishing of care and support to needy children in foster care. Payments may be made at the end of each month for the needy children maintained in foster care during the month.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11402 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1166, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

11409.

To the extent required by federal law, the department shall establish specific numeric goals for the number of children receiving AFDC-FC payments who have been in foster care two years or longer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 977, Sec. 10.   Effective September 13, 1982.   Operative October 1, 1982, by Sec. 36 of Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

11410.

(a) The department shall amend the foster care state plan required under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), to authorize counties that elect to subsidize child care for foster parents to use federal matching funds under Subtitle IV-E for that purpose.

(b) When approved by the federal government, counties electing to administer the Foster Parent Child Care Program shall follow the guidelines developed by the
 State Department of Social Services.

(c) Federal funds used by a county pursuant to this section shall be matched only by county funds pursuant to Section 15200.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Computation and Payment of Aid Grants [11450. - 11469.3.]

11450.

(a) (1) (A)   Aid shall be paid for each needy family, which shall include all eligible children of each eligible applicant or recipient child and the parents of the children, but shall not include a fetus, or recipients of aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), qualified for aid under this chapter. In determining the amount of aid paid, and notwithstanding the minimum basic standards of adequate care specified in Section 11452, the family’s income, exclusive of any amounts considered exempt as income or paid pursuant to subdivision (e) or Section 11453.1, determined for the prospective semiannual period pursuant to Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, and then calculated pursuant to
 Section 11451.5, shall be deducted from the sum specified in the following table, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases pursuant to Section 11453 and paragraph (2). In no case shall the amount of aid paid for each month exceed the sum specified in the following table, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases pursuant to Section 11453 and paragraph (2), plus any special needs, as specified in subdivisions (c), (e), and (f):Number of
eligible needy
persons in
the same homeMaximum
aid 1$ 326 2 535 3 663 4 788 5 899 6 1,010 7 1,109 8 1,209 9 1,30610 or more 1,403(B) If, when, and during those times that the United States government increases or decreases its contributions in assistance of needy children in this state above or below the amount paid on July 1, 1972, the amounts
 specified in the above table shall be increased or decreased by an amount equal to that increase or decrease by the United States government, provided that no increase or decrease shall be subject to subsequent adjustment pursuant to Section 11453.

(2) The sums specified in paragraph (1) shall not be adjusted for cost of living for the 1990–91, 1991–92, 1992–93, 1993–94, 1994–95, 1995–96, 1996–97, and 1997–98 fiscal years, and through October 31, 1998, nor shall that amount be included in the base for calculating any cost-of-living increases for any fiscal year thereafter. Elimination of the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of former Section 11453.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.

(b) (1) (A) Until the date that paragraph (2) is effective, if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant child who is 18 years of age or younger at any time after verification of pregnancy, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant child and the child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy shall be required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), and until the date that paragraph (2) is effective, if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant person for the month in which the birth is
 anticipated and for the six-month period immediately prior to the month in which the birth is anticipated, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy is required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant person as of the date of the application for aid, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant person or the child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy shall be required as a
 condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.

(B) A pregnant person may provide verification of pregnancy as required in subparagraph (A) by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for benefits to continue. If the applicant fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue aid when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.

(C) (i) A person who receives aid pursuant to this paragraph shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 30 days following the end of their
 pregnancy.

(ii) Aid for persons under this paragraph shall discontinue at the end of the month following the month in which the person reports the end of their pregnancy to the county human services agency.

(iii) Prior to discontinuing aid for a person under this paragraph due to the end of their pregnancy, the county human services agency shall provide information about, and referral to, mental health services, including, but not limited to, services provided by the county human services agency, when appropriate.

(D) This paragraph shall take effect on July 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation
 to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later.

(c) (1) The amount of forty-seven dollars ($47) per month shall be paid to a pregnant person qualified for aid under subdivision (a) or (b) to meet the special needs resulting from pregnancy if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. The county human services agency shall require a pregnant person to provide medical verification of pregnancy. The county human services agency shall refer all recipients of aid under this subdivision to a local provider of the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, and, commencing October 1, 2023, to perinatal home visiting services administered by the county public health agency, county human services agency, or applicable county home visiting provider.
 If that payment to a pregnant person qualified for aid under subdivision (a) is considered income under federal law in the first five months of pregnancy, payments under this subdivision do not apply to a person eligible under subdivision (a), except for the month in which birth is anticipated and for the three-month period immediately prior to the month in which delivery is anticipated, if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter.

(2) A pregnant person may provide the verification of pregnancy required by paragraph (1) by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for the pregnancy special need benefit to continue. If the pregnant person
 fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue the benefit when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.

(3) Beginning May 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, the special needs payment described in paragraph (1) shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per month.

(4) Beginning July 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, the special needs payment described in this
 subdivision shall discontinue at the end of the month following the month in which a person reports the end of their pregnancy to the county human services agency.

(d) For children receiving AFDC-FC under this chapter, there shall be paid, exclusive of any amount considered exempt as income, an amount of aid each month that, if added to the child’s income, is equal to the rate specified in Section 11460, 11461, 11462, or 11463. In addition, the child is eligible for special needs, as specified in departmental regulations.

(e) In addition to the amounts payable under subdivision (a) and former Section 11453.1, a family is entitled to receive an allowance for recurring special needs not common to a majority of recipients. These recurring special needs include, but are not limited
 to, special diets upon the recommendation of a physician for circumstances other than pregnancy, and unusual costs of transportation, laundry, housekeeping services, telephone, and utilities. The recurring special needs allowance for each family per month shall not exceed that amount resulting from multiplying the sum of ten dollars ($10) by the number of recipients in the family who are eligible for assistance.

(f) (1) After a family has used all available liquid resources, both exempt and nonexempt, in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), with the exception of funds deposited in a restricted account described in subdivision (a) of Section 11155.2, the family is also entitled to receive an allowance for nonrecurring special needs. This paragraph does not apply to the allowance for nonrecurring special needs for homeless
 assistance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(2) An allowance for nonrecurring special needs shall be granted for replacement of clothing and household equipment and for emergency housing needs other than those needs addressed by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3). These needs shall be caused by sudden and unusual circumstances beyond the control of the needy family. The department shall establish the allowance for each of the nonrecurring special needs items. The sum of all nonrecurring special needs provided by this subdivision shall not
 exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per event.

(3) (A) (i) An allowance for nonrecurring special needs for homeless assistance is available to a family that is homeless and seeking shelter when the family is eligible for aid under this chapter.

(ii) (I) Homeless assistance for temporary shelter is also available to families that are homeless and seeking shelter that are apparently eligible for aid under this chapter. Apparent eligibility exists when evidence presented by the applicant, or that is otherwise available to the county human services agency, and the information provided on the application documents indicate that there would be eligibility for aid under this chapter if the evidence and
 information were verified. However, a noncitizen applicant who does not provide verification of their eligible immigrant status, or a person with no eligible children who does not provide verification of their pregnancy, is not apparently eligible for purposes of this section.

(II) A pregnant person may provide verification of pregnancy, as required in subclause (I), by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for benefits to continue. If the applicant fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue aid when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.

(iii) Homeless assistance for temporary shelter is also available to families that are homeless and seeking shelter that would be eligible for aid under this chapter but for the fact that the only child or children in the family are in out-of-home placement pursuant to an order of the dependency court, if the family is receiving reunification services and the county determines that homeless assistance is necessary for reunification to occur.

(B) A family is considered homeless, for the purpose of this section, when the family lacks a fixed and regular nighttime residence, the family has a primary nighttime residence that is a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, or the family is residing in a public or private place
 not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. A family is also considered homeless for the purpose of this section if the family has received a notice to pay rent or quit.

(4) (A) (i) A nonrecurring special needs benefit of eighty-five dollars ($85) a day shall be available to families of up to four members for the costs of temporary shelter, subject to the requirements of this paragraph. The fifth and additional members of the family shall each receive fifteen dollars ($15) per day, up to a daily maximum of one hundred forty-five dollars ($145). County human services agencies may increase the daily amount available for temporary shelter as necessary to secure the additional bedspace needed by the family.

(ii) This special needs benefit shall be granted or denied the same day as the family’s application for homeless assistance, and benefits shall be available for up to three working days. Upon applying for homeless assistance, the family shall provide a sworn statement that the family is homeless. If the family meets the criteria of questionable homelessness, which means that there is reason to suspect that the family has permanent housing, the county human services agency shall refer the family to its early fraud prevention and detection unit, if the county has such a unit, for assistance in the verification of homelessness within this period.

(iii) After homelessness has been verified, the three-day limit shall be extended for a period of time that, when added to the initial benefits provided, does not exceed a total of 16 calendar days. This
 extension of benefits shall be done in increments of one week, and shall be based upon searching for permanent housing, which shall be documented on a housing search form, good cause, or other circumstances defined by the department. Documentation of a housing search is required for the initial extension of benefits beyond the three-day limit and on a weekly basis thereafter if the family is receiving temporary shelter benefits. Good cause shall include, but is not limited to, situations in which the county human services agency has determined that the family, to the extent it is capable, has made a good faith but unsuccessful effort to secure permanent housing while receiving temporary shelter benefits or that the family is homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster.

(iv) Notwithstanding clauses (ii)
 and (iii), the county may waive the three-day limit and may provide benefits in increments of more than one week for a family that becomes homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster.

(B) (i) A nonrecurring special needs benefit for permanent housing assistance is available to pay for last month’s rent and security deposits if these payments are conditions of
 securing a residence, or to pay for up to two months of rent arrearages, if these payments are a reasonable condition of preventing eviction.

(ii) The last month’s rent or monthly arrearage portion of the payment shall meet both of the following requirements:

(I) (ia) It shall not exceed 80 percent of the family’s total monthly household income without the value of CalFresh benefits or special needs benefit for a family of that size.

(ib) Beginning January 1, 2026, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later, and for purposes of this subparagraph,
 the county human services agency shall include in the calculation of the family’s total monthly household income any amount that is regularly received or will be regularly received from other government and nonprofit housing and homeless subsidy programs and any regularly received private support intended or designed to help the family with housing, such as financial support from an individual outside the household. The additional sources of income described in the previous sentence shall not be included in the calculation of the family’s income for purposes of calculating the amount of aid paid pursuant to subdivision (a).

(II) (ia) It shall only be made to families that have found permanent housing costing no more than 80 percent of the family’s total monthly household income without the value of CalFresh benefits
 or special needs benefit for a family of that size.

(ib) Beginning January 1, 2026, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later, and for purposes of this subparagraph, the county human services agency shall include in the calculation of the family’s total monthly household income any amount that is regularly received or will be regularly received from other government and nonprofit housing and homeless subsidy programs and any regularly received private support intended or designed to help the family with housing, such as financial support from an individual outside the household. The additional sources of income described in the previous sentence shall not be included in the
 calculation of the family’s income for purposes of calculating the amount of aid paid pursuant to subdivision (a).

(iii) However, if the county human services agency determines that a family intends to reside with individuals who will be sharing housing costs, the county human services agency shall, in appropriate circumstances, set aside the condition specified in subclause (II) of clause (ii).

(C) The nonrecurring special needs benefit for permanent housing assistance is also available to cover the standard costs of deposits for utilities that are necessary for the health and safety of the family.

(D) A payment for, or denial of, permanent housing assistance shall be issued no later than one working day from the time
 that a family presents evidence of the availability of permanent housing. If an applicant family provides evidence of the availability of permanent housing before the county human services agency has established eligibility for aid under this chapter, the county human services agency shall complete the eligibility determination so that the payment for, or denial of, permanent housing assistance is issued within one working day from the submission of evidence of the availability of permanent housing, unless the family has failed to provide all of the verification necessary to establish eligibility for aid under this chapter.

(E) (i) Except as provided in clauses (ii) and (iii), eligibility for the temporary shelter assistance and the permanent housing assistance pursuant to this paragraph is limited to the number of days
 allowable under subparagraph (A) for temporary shelter assistance and one payment of permanent housing assistance every 12 months. A person who applies for homeless assistance benefits shall be informed that, with certain exceptions, the temporary shelter benefit is limited to the number of days allowable under subparagraph (A) for the 12-month period.

(ii) (I) A family that becomes homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster is eligible for homeless assistance.

(II) If there is a state or federally declared disaster in a county, the county human services agency shall coordinate with public and private disaster response organizations and agencies to identify and inform recipients of their eligibility for homeless
 assistance available pursuant to subclause (H).

(iii) A family is eligible for homeless assistance if homelessness is a direct result of domestic violence by a spouse, partner, or roommate; physical or mental illness that is medically verified that shall not include a diagnosis of alcoholism, drug addiction, or
 psychological stress; or the uninhabitability of the former residence caused by sudden and unusual circumstances beyond the control of the family, including natural catastrophe, fire, or condemnation. These circumstances shall be verified by a third-party governmental or private health and human services agency, except that domestic violence may also be verified by a sworn statement by the victim, as provided under Section 11495.25. Homeless assistance payments based on these specific circumstances may not be received more often than once in any 12-month period. In addition, if the domestic violence is verified by a sworn statement by the victim, the homeless assistance payments shall be limited to two periods of not more than 16 cumulative calendar days of temporary shelter assistance and two payments of permanent housing assistance. A county may require that a recipient of homeless
 assistance benefits who qualifies under this paragraph for a second time in a 24-month period participate in a homelessness avoidance case plan as a condition of eligibility for homeless assistance benefits. However, commencing October 1, 2023, a county may require participation in that homelessness avoidance case plan as a condition of eligibility only if the county has also provided a housing navigation caseworker who can assist with securing permanent housing and housing case management services. The county human services agency shall immediately inform recipients who verify domestic violence by a sworn statement of the availability of domestic violence counseling and services, and refer those recipients to services upon request.

(iv) If a county requires a recipient who verifies domestic violence by a sworn statement to
 participate in a homelessness avoidance case plan pursuant to clause (iii), the plan shall include the provision of domestic violence services, if appropriate.

(v) If a recipient seeking homeless assistance based on domestic violence pursuant to clause (iii) has previously received homeless avoidance services based on domestic violence, the county shall review whether services were offered to the recipient and consider what additional services would assist the recipient in leaving the domestic violence situation.

(vi) The county human services agency shall report necessary data to the department through a statewide homeless assistance payment indicator system, as requested by the department, regarding all recipients of aid under this paragraph.

(F) Payments to providers for temporary shelter and permanent housing and utilities shall be made on behalf of families requesting these payments.

(G) The daily amount for the temporary shelter special needs benefit for homeless assistance may be increased if authorized by the current year’s Budget Act by specifying a different daily allowance and appropriating the funds therefor.

(H) A payment shall not be made pursuant to this paragraph unless the provider of housing is any of the following:

(i) A commercial establishment.

(ii) A shelter.

(iii) A person with whom, or an establishment with which, the family requesting assistance has executed a valid lease, sublease, or shared housing agreement.

(I) (i) A CalWORKs applicant who provides a sworn statement of past or present domestic abuse and who is fleeing their abuser is deemed to be homeless and is eligible for temporary shelter assistance under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) and under subparagraph (E), notwithstanding any income and assets attributable to the alleged abuser.

(ii) The homeless assistance payments issued under this subparagraph shall be granted the same day as the family’s application, and benefits shall be available in increments of 16 days of temporary shelter assistance pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph
 (A). The homeless assistance payments shall be limited to two periods of not more than 16 cumulative calendar days each of temporary shelter assistance within the applicant’s lifetime. The second 16-day period shall continue to be available when the applicant becomes a CalWORKs recipient during the first 16-day period. The homeless assistance payments issued under this subparagraph shall be in addition to other payments for which the CalWORKs applicant, if the applicant becomes a CalWORKs recipient, may later qualify under this subdivision.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the housing search documentation described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) shall be required only upon issuance of an immediate need payment pursuant to Section 11266 or the issuance of benefits for the month of application.

(g) The department shall establish rules and regulations ensuring the uniform statewide application of this section.

(h) The department shall notify all applicants and recipients of aid through the standardized application form that these benefits are available and shall provide an opportunity for recipients to apply for the funds quickly and efficiently.

(i) The department shall work with county human services
 agencies, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and advocates of CalWORKs recipients to gather information regarding the actual costs of a nightly shelter and best practices for transitioning families from a temporary shelter to permanent housing, and to provide that information to the Legislature, to be submitted annually in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(j) (1) Except for the purposes of Section 15200, the amounts payable to recipients pursuant to Section 11453.1 shall not constitute part of the payment schedule set forth in subdivision (a).

(2) The amounts payable to recipients pursuant to Section 11453.1 shall not constitute income to recipients of aid under this section.

(k) For children receiving Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), there shall be paid, exclusive of any amount considered exempt as income, an amount of aid each month, which, when added to the child’s income, is equal to the rate specified in Sections 11364 and 11387.
